tr: Yumurta bileşeni: Yumurta karışımı; Yumurta ikamesi; Yumurta akı; Yumurta sarısı; Karışık yumurta parçaları; Tam yumurta; Diğer
ro-RO: Componentă de ou: Amestec de ou; Înlocuitor de ou; Albuș de ou; Gălbenuș de ou; Părți de ou amestecate; Ou întreg; Altele
bg-BG: Яйчен компонент: Яйчна смес; Заместител на яйца; Белтък; Жълтък; Смесени части от яйце; Цяло яйце; Друго
fi: Munan osa: Munaseos; Kananmunan korvike; Valkuainen; Keltuainen; Sekoitetut munanosat; Kokonainen kananmuna; Muu
hr-HR: Komponenta jaja: Mješavina jaja; Zamjena za jaja; Bjelanjak; Žumanjak; Miješani dijelovi jaja; Cijelo jaje; Ostalo
da: Æggebestanddel: Æggeblanding; Æggeerstatning; Æggehvide; Æggeblomme; Blandede æggedele; Helt æg; Andet
nl: Ei component: Eimix; Eivervanger; Eiwit; Eidooier; Gemengde eibestanddelen; Heel ei; Overige
el: Συστατικό αυγού: Μείγμα αυγού; Υποκατάστατο αυγού; Ασπράδι αυγού; Κρόκος αυγού; Διάφορα μέρη αυγού; Ολόκληρο αυγό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Jajčna komponenta: Mešanica jajc; Jajčni nadomestek; Jajčni beljak; Jajčni rumenjak; Mešani deli jajca; Celo jajce; Drugo
cs: Vaječná složka: Vaječná směs; Náhražka vajec; Bílek; Žloutek; Smíchané části vajec; Celé vejce; Jiné
ja: 卵コンポーネント: 卵ブレンド; 代替卵; 卵白; 卵黄; 混合卵; 全卵; その他
zh-TW: 雞蛋成分: 混合蛋液; 蛋替代品; 蛋白; 蛋黃; 混合蛋液成分; 全蛋; 其他
sk-SK: Vaječná zložka: Vaječná zmes; Náhrada vajec; Bielok; Žĺtok; Zmiešané časti vajec; Celé vajce; Iné
nb: Eggkomponent: Eggeblanding; Eggerstatning; Eggehvite; Eggeplomme; Blandede eggdeler; Hele egg; Annet
hu: Tojásösszetevő: Tojáskeverék; Tojáspótló; Tojásfehérje; Tojássárgája; Vegyes tojásrészek; Egész tojás; Egyéb
es: Componente del huevo: Mezcla de huevo; Sustituto de huevo; Clara de huevo; Yema de huevo; Partes de huevo mixtas; Huevo entero; Otro
vi: Thành phần trứng: Hỗn hợp trứng; Chất thay thế trứng; Lòng trắng trứng; Lòng đỏ trứng; Thành phần trứng hỗn hợp; Trứng nguyên quả; Khác
de: Ei-Komponente: Ei-Mischung; Eiersatz; Eiweiß; Eigelb; Gemischte Eibestandteile; Vollei; Sonstige
pt-BR: Componente de ovo: Mistura de ovo; Substituto de ovo; Clara de ovo; Gema de ovo; Partes de ovo misturadas; Ovo inteiro; Outro
pl: Składnik jaja: Mieszanka jajeczna; Zamiennik jajka; Białko jajka; Żółtko jajka; Mieszane części jajka; Całe jajko; Inne
lt-LT: Kiaušinio komponentas: Kiaušinių mišinys; Kiaušinių pakaitalas; Kiaušinio baltymas; Kiaušinio trynys; Sumaišytos kiaušinio dalys; Visas kiaušinis; Kita
pt-PT: Componente do ovo: Mistura de ovos; Substituto de ovo; Clara de ovo; Gema de ovo; Partes de ovo misturadas; Ovo inteiro; Outro
th: ส่วนประกอบของไข่: ไข่ผสม; สิ่งทดแทนไข่; ไข่ขาว; ไข่แดง; ส่วนผสมของไข่; ไข่ทั้งฟอง; อื่นๆ
ko: 계란 성분: 계란 블렌드; 계란 대체재; 계란 흰자; 계란 노른자; 혼합 계란 부위; 전란; 기타
ru: Компонент яйца: Яичная смесь; Заменитель яйца; Яичный белок; Яичный желток; Смешанные части яйца; Цельное яйцо; Другое
sv: Äggkomponent: Äggblandning; Äggersättning; Äggvita; Äggula; Blandade äggdelar; Helt ägg; Övrigt
it: Componente dell'uovo: Miscela di uova; Sostituto dell’uovo; Albume; Tuorlo; Parti di uova miste; Uovo intero; Altro
zh-CN: 蛋原料类型: 混合蛋液; 代蛋; 蛋清; 蛋黄; 混合蛋类部分; 全蛋; 其他
en: Egg component: Egg Blend; Egg Substitute; Egg White; Egg Yolk; Mixed Egg Parts; Whole Egg; Other
fr: Partie de l’œuf: Mélange d’œufs; Substitut d’œuf; Blanc d’œuf; Jaune d’œuf; Parties d’œufs mélangées; Œuf entier; Autre